Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1224
Governing board; state, county, or federal funds; use; tax; levy; matching of funds.

The board of each educational service unit may receive, for the purpose for which made available, any school district, county, state, or federal funds made available to it, or funds or property received from any other source, and may use tax revenue from the levy of the educational service unit for operational expenses and for the purpose of matching any funds that may be made available to it on a matching basis by any state or federal agency. The board of each educational service unit may utilize such personnel or services that may lawfully be offered by any state or federal agency or governmental unit.

Laws 1965, c. 504, § 9, p. 1612;

Laws 1972, LB 928, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2209;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 941.